RoadMAP :- https://www.reddit.com/r/webdev/comments/vfy708/full_stack_road_map/#lightbox

LIST OF JDS AS FULL STACK DEVELOPER 
________________________________________________________________________________
JD-1 
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-arm-infotech-dindigul-3-to-8-years-230524500568?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=2&px=1
Job description
Proficiency in front-end technologies such as HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and front-end frameworks (e.g., React, Angular, Vue.js).
Strong backend development skills with expertise in one or more server-side technologies (e.g., Node.js, Python, Java, .NET).
Experience with database management systems (e.g., MySQL, PostgreSQL, MongoDB).
Familiarity with RESTful API design and integration.
Knowledge of version control systems (e.g., Git).
Excellent problem-solving and debugging skills.
Strong communication and teamwork abilities.
Experience with cloud services (e.g., AWS, Azure, Google Cloud).
Knowledge of containerization and orchestration tools (e.g., Docker, Kubernetes).
Basic understanding of Continuous Integration, Continuous Delivery, and Continuous Deployment (CI/CD) processes.

RESPONSIBILITY OVERVIEW
Your Role in Action!
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including designers, and other developers, to understand project requirements and translate them into technical specifications.
Develop and maintain web applications, ensuring optimal performance, security, and scalability.
Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code for both frontend and backend components.
Create and maintain databases, including data modeling, optimization, and migrations.
Implement responsive and visually appealing user interfaces using modern web technologies (HTML, CSS, and JavaScript).
Integrate third-party APIs and services to enhance the functionality of our applications.
Conduct thorough testing and debugging of applications to identify and fix issues.
Stay up-to-date with industry trends, emerging technologies, and best practices to continuously improve our development processes.
Collaborate on code reviews and provide constructive feedback to team members.
Assist in the deployment and maintenance of applications in various hosting environments.
------------------------------------------------
JD-2
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-reliance-new-energy-reliance-industries-ril-navi-mumbai-3-to-8-years-230524007143?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=3&px=1
Job Overview:

We are seeking a talented and proactive Full Stack Developer to join our dynamic software development team. The ideal candidate will have a strong foundation in both front-end and back-end development, capable of creating highly responsive web applications from concept to deployment. You will play a crucial role in developing and maintaining our suite of digital products, including web applications and services. This position requires a mix of development, design, and architecture skills, along with the ability to work in a fast-paced, agile environment.


Key Responsibilities:

1. Full Stack Development: Design, build, and maintain efficient, reusable, and reliable code across the full software development life cycle, including both front-end and back-end development.

2. Front-end Development: Create and enhance user interface components using modern JavaScript frameworks (such as React, Angular, Vue.js) and web technologies (HTML5, CSS3) to deliver an optimal user experience on both desktop and mobile devices.

3. Back-end Development: Develop and maintain server-side logic, definition, and maintenance of the central database, ensuring high performance and responsiveness to requests from the front-end.

4. API Development: Design and develop RESTful services and APIs for integration with internal and external systems.

5. Testing and Debugging: Write and maintain test cases to ensure robustness, usability, and reliability of the software components. Debug and resolve issues across the entire stack.

6. Performance Tuning: Optimize application for maximum speed and scalability, addressing and mitigating any performance issues.

7. Collaboration: Work with project managers, UX/UI designers, and other developers to ensure the technical feasibility of designs, providing input on the technical implications of design choices.

8. Continuous Learning: Stay abreast of emerging technologies and industry trends, applying them into operations and activities to enhance development practices.

9. Integrations: Integrating various apps to social media, Whatsapp, SMS etc


Qualifications:

1. Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field.

2. Minimum of 3 years of experience as a Full Stack Developer with a strong portfolio of projects demonstrating expertise in both front-end and back-end development.

3. Proficiency in front-end technologies, including JavaScript frameworks (React, Angular, Vue.js), HTML5, and CSS3.

4. Strong experience with back-end programming languages such as Node.js, Python, Ruby, Java, or .NET.

5. Experience with database technologies (SQL and NoSQL), web servers (e.g., Apache, Nginx), and UI/UX design.

6. Knowledge of code versioning tools (such as Git), and experience with continuous integration and deployment (CI/CD) pipelines.

7. Excellent problem-solving skills, ability to work in a team, and a strong desire to learn and adapt to new technologies.

8. Strong communication skills, both written and verbal, with the ability to clearly articulate technical challenges and solutions to both technical and non-technical team members.
----------------------------------------------
JD-3
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-godigi-infotech-mumbai-hyderabad-pune-bengaluru-0-to-1-years-100524500132?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=4&px=1
Job description
We are seeking a talented Full Stack Developer proficient in Python and Angular to join our dynamic team
The ideal candidate will have a strong background in developing web applications, with expertise in both front-end and back-end technologies
You will be responsible for designing, developing, and maintaining innovative solutions that meet our clients' needs
This position offers the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technologies in a collaborative and fast-paced environment
Responsibilities :

- Develop and maintain web applications using Python, Angular, FastAPI, HTML, CSS, and SQL

- Design and implement RESTful APIs for seamless integration between front-end and back-end systems

- Utilize Microsoft Azure services for cloud-based application deployment and management

- Collaborate with cross-functional teams to gather requirements and translate them into technical solutions

- Implement DevOps best practices for continuous integration and deployment, utilizing tools such as GitHub, Jenkins, Kubernetes, and Docker

- Ensure the scalability, performance, and security of the applications

- Troubleshoot and debug issues across the full stack

Requirements :

- Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or related field

- Proven experience as a Full Stack Developer or similar role

- Proficiency in Python, Angular, FastAPI, HTML, CSS, and SQL

- Familiarity with Microsoft Azure services, including Azure App Service, Azure SQL Database, and Azure DevOps

- Experience with DevOps technologies such as GitHub, Kubernetes, Jenkins, and Docker

- Strong understanding of database technologies, particularly PostgreSQL

- Knowledge of RESTful API design principles and best practices

- Excellent problem-solving and communication skills

- Ability to work effectively both independently and in a team environment

- Experience with Agile methodologies is a plus

Benefits :

- Competitive salary and benefits package

- Opportunities for career growth and advancement

- Flexible work hours and remote work options

- Collaborative and inclusive work environment

- Continuous learning and development opportunities
---------------------------------
JD-4
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-weatherford-navi-mumbai-pune-bengaluru-8-to-12-years-220524005272?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=5&px=1
Job description
Required Skills:

Must have Skills:
C#, OOPS, .NET Core, Web APIs, Angular, SQL Server
Preferred:
Microservices, MongoDB/Cassandra, RabbitMQ, SignalR, Azure
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
C#.Net ,CoreWeb Api,OOPS,Angular
C++,CassandraSQL ,Server,Microservices,Rabbitmq,Cloud Technologies,NoSQL,Docker,Message Broker,MongoDB,Signalr,azure,Kubernetes
-----------------------------------------
JD-5
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-genpact-hyderabad-gurugram-bengaluru-10-to-20-years-131123000917?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=6&px=1
Role: Full Stack Developer


We are seeking a highly skilled and experienced Full Stack Developer to join our dynamic team. As a Full Stack Developer, you will be responsible for developing and maintaining web applications, ensuring seamless functionality and exceptional user experience across all platforms. The ideal candidate should have a solid background in both front-end and back-end development.

Responsibilities

Develop and maintain web applications using modern technologies and frameworks.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to gather and define project requirements.
Design and implement scalable, secure, and efficient solutions for both front-end and back-end development.
Create responsive user interfaces and ensure seamless integration with the back-end systems.
Write clean, reusable, and efficient code following industry best practices.
Conduct thorough testing and debugging to ensure high-quality software delivery.
Optimize applications for maximum speed and scalability.
Stay up-to-date with emerging technologies and industry trends, and propose innovative solutions to improve the development process.
Collaborate with UI/UX designers to implement visually appealing and user-friendly interfaces.
Troubleshoot and resolve issues reported by users or stakeholders in a timely manner.
Document technical specifications and system architecture for reference purposes.
Participate in code reviews to maintain code quality and ensure adherence to coding standards.
Qualifications we seek in you!

Minimum Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field.
Proven work experience as a Full Stack Developer .
Strong proficiency in front-end technologies such as HTML5, CSS3, JavaScript, and modern JavaScript frameworks (e.g., React, Angular, Vue.js).
Proficient in server-side programming languages such as Node.js, Python, or Java.
Experience working with databases (e.g., MySQL, MongoDB, PostgreSQL) and writing efficient queries.
Familiarity with RESTful APIs and third-party integration.
Knowledge of version control systems (e.g., Git) and collaborative development workflows.
Solid understanding of web application architecture and design patterns.
Experience with cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure, Google Cloud) and deployment processes.
Excellent problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
Strong communication and interpersonal skills, with the ability to work effectively in a collaborative team environment.
Self-motivated and able to work independently, with a proactive attitude towards learning new technologies.
Preferred Qualifications/ Skills

Master's degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field.
Experience with containerization technologies (e.g., Docker, Kubernetes).
Knowledge of backend frameworks (e.g., Express.js, Django, Spring).
Familiarity with Agile development methodologies.
Experience with continuous integration and deployment (CI/CD) pipelines.
Knowledge of security best practices and experience with web application security.
Contribution to open-source projects or personal coding projects.
--------------------------------------
JD-6
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-ibm-india-pvt-limited-kochi-10-to-15-years-130524907088?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=7&px=1
Job Responsibilities:
As a Backend developer you will be responsible for development/ maintenance/ Support of the Match360 applications through the full systems development lifecycle.
Participate in the design and implementation of sophisticated software systems front end.
You will work with the Product Architects, Product Managers to understand various priorities and work towards the execution.
Participate in software design and code reviews. Reviews include other Software Engineers and are held to ensure a high level of software quality and to share knowledge with team members.
Participate in, and adhere to, professional software engineering practices using such tools and methodologies as Agile Software Development, Test Driven Development, Continuous Integration, Source Code Management (git), and GitHub.
Ensure good code coverage. Support bug fixes during testing and deploy to target environments.
Participate in the planning, creation and execution of automated test cases and load/performance testing. Create/maintain technical documentation.
Hands on experience in handling and debugging customer issues, work with L2 support team.
Maintain a high level of proficiency with Computer Science/Software Engineering knowledge and contribute to the technical skills growth of other team members.
You will be providing vigilance and compliance to various software engineering, support and release processes e.g security, stack upgrades that are free of vulnerabilities etc.


Required Technical and Professional Expertise
10 - 15 years of professional/industrial experience in software development.
Good Expertise in JavaScript, React, Redux, HTML/CSS, NodeJS, Node Express, SaaS, MVC Web Frameworks.
Expertise in RESTful APIs, JavaScript, Java J2EE, Microservices Architecture, MVC Web Frameworks. Expertise with consuming REST APIs from JavaScript based UX
Experience in using messaging brokers like RabbitMQ, Kafka etc
Understanding and experience writing and executing Unit and Integration Tests as part of Test-Driven DevOps Development
Understanding and experience with at least one relational database (DB2, Oracle etc.)
Understanding and experience with Agile, and Design/Implementation and Secure Software Engineering Best Practices
Working knowledge on tools like GitHub, Jenkins, Maven/Gradle.
Experience implementing distributed applications in a container environment
Ability to learn and apply new technologies quickly
Strong sense of ownership of deliverables


Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Degree in Computer Science Engineering, or equivalent professional experience.
Working experience on Docker/Kubernetes, RedHat OpenShift, Linux Operating Systems (such as Red Hat, Ubuntu, etc.) , the DevOps
Experience working with open-source technologies.
------------------------
JD-7
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-sr-developer-java-backend-with-kafka-java-full-stack-reactjs-wipro-hyderabad-chennai-bengaluru-5-to-8-years-200524003602
Sr. Developer - Java Backend with Kafka / Java Fullstack (ReactJs.) / Java with Spark

Mandatory & Primary Skills required for the job?

Coding expertise in Java 8.0 and above version
SpringBoot
Microservices
Kafka
GIT / Maven / Gradle
NoSQL / MongoDB/ GraphDB / any other Data Streaming technologies
(or)

Coding expertise in Java 8.0 and above version
SpringBoot
Microservices
ReactJs
HTML 4/5, CSS 2/3, JavaScript (ES6)
PLSQL / MYSQL / NoSQL / MongoDB/ any other RDBMS tool expertise
(or)

Coding expertise in Java 8.0 and above version
SpringBoot
Microservices
Spark
Docker, Kubernetes or EKS
Bigdata / Hadoop
AWS / GCP
Education qualifications required for the Job?

B.Tech / BE / M.Tech / MCA / MSc (computer science / IT / Data Science) as full time academic qualification

Experience Range: 5 - 8 Yrs.

Technical Skill Requirement Must Have:

Expertise with enterprise applications development
Hands-on expertise in Java 8.0 and above version programming
Must have expertise in SpringBoot
Must have experience in Microservices Experience with Queuing related technologies like Kafka
Proficiency of dev/build tools: GIT / Maven / Gradle
Experience with the modern NoSQL/Graph DB/Data Streaming technologies
Expertise with enterprise applications development
Hands-on expertise in Java 8.0 and above version programming
Must have expertise in SpringBoot
Must have experience in Microservices Hands-on programming experience in ReactJs.
Hands on experience in web technologies like HTML 4/5, CSS 2/3, JavaScript (ES6)
Expertise in any RDBMS tools - PLSQL / MYSQL / NoSQL / MongoDB etc.
Good to Have:

In-depth knowledge of integration patterns, integration technologies and integration platforms
Good hands-on experience to design and build cloud ready application.
Good understanding of Agile software development methodology
Excellent understanding of design patterns / data structures / algorithms
Proficiency of dev/build tools: GIT / Maven / Gradle Technical Skill Requirement
Experience in building and managing big data platforms and programming experience in Java
In-depth knowledge of Spark, or other distributed computing frameworks
Understanding of SQL query engines like Trino, Hive etc.
Experience with Docker, Kubernetes or EKS
Experience with debugging issues on distributed systems.
Knowledge of software engineering practices and standard methodologies for the full software development lifecycle
Experience with public cloud (AWS/GCP)
Have created frameworks to deploy platforms in AWS/Azure/GCP.
Good understanding of AI/ML stack - GPUs, MLFlow, LLM models is plus.
Experience in building, tuning, scaling, and monitoring applications to process real-time, near-real-time and batch data
Understanding of data modelling, data warehousing, and ETL concepts is a plus
--------------------------------------
JD-8
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-ey-bengaluru-4-to-8-years-210524009931?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=8&px=1
Experience in developing web based applications on Microsoft .Net (ASP.NET & ASP .NET CORE) framework

Angular 2+(No Angular JS), Typescript, C# - Very good command on these

JavaScript, HTML, CSS, JQuery, MVC and WebAPI fairly good experience in these areas

MS SQL Server management Studio (SSMS) to develop database objects such as Stored Procedures, Functions, views, triggers, constraints etc.-Good working knowledge of SSMS/SQL
---------------------
JD-9
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-cisnge-infosys-limited-bengaluru-2-to-3-years-200524903875?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=9&px=1
Job description
Responsibilities
A good track record of project delivery for large cross-team projects
Exceptional debugging, testing, and problem-solving skills

Technical and Professional Requirements:
Primary skills:Domain->User Experience Design->UX Strategy,Technology->Cloud Platform->Google app engine APIs,Tools,Technology->Reactive Programming->react JS,Technology->UI & Markup Language->Angular JS,Technology->UI & Markup Language->Javascript

Preferred Skills:
Technology->Cloud Platform->Google app engine APIs/Tools
Technology->UI & Markup Language->Angular JS/Angular 1.x
Technology->UI & Markup Language->Javascript
Domain->User Experience Design->UX Strategy
Technology->Reactive Programming->react JS

Additional Responsibilities:
Knowledge on ServiceNow will be added advantage

Educational Requirements
Bachelor of Engineering

Service Line
Cloud & Infrastructure Services
* Location of posting is subject to business requirements
--------------------------------------
JD-10
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-restful-apis-edge-bengaluru-5-to-10-years-240524909938?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=10&px=1
Job description
SQL Python
Web architecture, including RESTful APIs, microservices, and the ability to design scalable and maintainable web applications. Agile
HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and modern front-end frameworks like React, Angular, or Vue.js. PL/SQL (Procedural Language / Structure Query Language)
Back-end technologies and languages (e.g., Node.js, Python, Java, .NET) and associated frameworks (e.g., Express, Django) Other Data Visualization Tools like Tableau
Web Performance Optimization
Web Monitoring and Analytics
Web Application Security
----------------------------------------------
JD-11
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-ibu-solution-services-full-stack-developer-eli-lilly-and-company-bengaluru-6-to-8-years-230524500073?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=11&px=1
Job description
The IBU Solution Services Full Stack Lead is responsible for the Technical Excellence of the cloud application and service portfolio for Lilly International. Technical Excellence is defined as the ability to foresee and eliminate an issue before it has the potential to jeopardize security, schedule, budget, sustainability , and most importantly, client satisfaction.

Key Responsibilities:

Provides technical leadership and consultancy to IBU Solution Services in close partnership with IBU Architect to ensure that the delivery of cloud solutions is aligned with the Enterprise IT architecture.
Leads external vendor partners to build a cost-effective solution and deploy it on a Cloud platform (AWS/ Azure)
Creates and reviews system designs to leverage existing standards or evaluate alternative technologies.
Reviews development quotations provided by external service providers and challenges them if needed.
Directs external service providers who develop and implement solutions to follow the agreed system design.
Assists in the scoping of user stories and the review of effort estimates.
Reviews source code provided by external service providers.
Ensures coding standards or technical implementation guides are in place for IBU cloud platforms or technologies and educates external service providers to ensure they are followed.
Acts as a mentor and guide to individual team members that want to learn or adopt a new cloud technology.
Collaborates with external service providers and IBU Service Management to prioritize and resolve incidents for IT systems and perform problem management to ensure resolution of root causes.
Helps to establish a DevSecOps to improve the quality, security, automation capabilities and stability of our cloud solutions.
Identifies synergies and reuse opportunities to improve efficiency and cost savings.
Identifies and drives proof of concepts for emerging technologies at Lilly and helps the IBU Solution Services team prepare for the adoption of these technologies.
Technical Skills Requirement:

(6 to 8) years of experience in FULL STACK DEVELOPMENT which includes server-side code, database and API integrations, and front-end website development.

REST API:
RESTful Web Services
WEB APPLICATIONS
GITHUB
Cross Browser Issues
JSON/XML DATA

UI Tech
React (MUST)/Angular/
Redux
JavaScript
HTML
CSS
Bootstrap/Material UI/ANT Design
Responsive Web Design
MVC framework
Unit Testing Framework

Backend
Node JS (MUST)
Express JS
Microservice Architecture
Swagger Documentation
Error Handling and Logging Library
Unit Testing Framework
DB
MySQL/NoSQL
Essential Skills:

Bachelor s or master s degree in information technology
Ability to translate requirements into technical solutions.
Ability to collaborate with technical and non-technical colleagues.
Ability to resolve issues across geographical and cultural boundaries.
Evidence of creativity, pro activity and influencing skills.
Experience with Incident and Problem management processes, tools, and techniques
Demonstrated ability to quickly learn new technology areas (Strong learning agility)
Excellent analytical, problem solving, and investigative skills
Demonstrated interpersonal skills, collaboration, and teamwork.
Strong communication written and verbal.
Self-motivated to prioritize and complete multiple tasks without direct supervision.
Ability to quickly adapt to changing circumstances, priorities.
Understanding of IT life cycle methodology processes.
Good to have Skills:

Working experience on Cloud - AWS / Azure
Working with multiple internal IT organizations or external suppliers, virtually and across different geographies.
Experience working in the agile methodology.
Experience with development of cloud applications. This includes coding standards, programming, code reviews, source management (GitHub)
-------------------------------------------------
JD-11
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-cce-software-kolkata-chennai-bengaluru-1-to-3-years-230524005201?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=12&px=1
Job description
FullStack DotNet Developer ( DotNet core , Angular 10+)”

Skills: Dot.Net core, Angular 10+, HTML 5, CSS, Typescript & MYSQL

Having 1-2 years of IT experience.
Strong hands-on experience with Dot.Net core and Angular 10+.
Good experience on HTML , CSS & Typescript.
Good to have knowledge in Microsoft Windows Applications including .Net, WPF, C#, VB.Net & MVVM.
Ability to work independently and excellent interpersonal and communication skills
----------------------------------
JD-12
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-rainsoft-global-hyderabad-chennai-bengaluru-1-to-6-years-220524906513?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=14&px=1
Job description
Responsibilities:

Develop responsive web apps with React.js and Node.js.
Design user interfaces and implement new features.
Write clean, efficient code and conduct testing.
Optimize applications for speed and scalability.

Requirements:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or equivalent experience.
Strong skills in JavaScript, HTML5, and CSS3.
Proficiency in React.js and Node.js.
Experience with databases and RESTful APIs.
Ability to work in Agile environments and communicate effectively.

Location - Hyderabad,Chennai,Bengaluru,Mumbai,Noida

Role: Full Stack Developer
---------------------------------
JD-13
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-allegis-group-noida-6-to-9-years-200524003947?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=16&px=1
Job description
Experience:
7+ years in a Java/J2EE environment with a strong emphasis on web application development.
Technical Skills:
Proficient in Angular 2+/ReactJs, Spring Frameworks, Hibernate, JDBC, JSP, Servlets, REST APIs, and Maven.
Strong SQL skills with experience in MySQL and PostgreSQL.
Expertise in JQuery, JavaScript, and Bootstrap.
Familiarity with Swagger for API validation.
Basic knowledge of Git for version control.
Comfortable with Linux commands for project-related tasks.
Soft Skills:
Quick learner with a keen ability to adapt to new technologies.
Excellent team player with strong collaboration skills.
Ability to meet tight deadlines and work effectively under pressure.

Key Responsibilities:

Web Application Development:
Develop robust web applications using Angular 2+/ReactJs, Spring Frameworks, Hibernate, JDBC, JSP, Servlets, and REST APIs.
Database Management:
Design and implement database schemas.
Write user-defined database functions, stored procedures, cursors, views, and complex SQL queries.
Work with MySQL and PostgreSQL databases.
Front-End Design:
Utilize JQuery, JavaScript, and Bootstrap to create responsive and interactive web pages.
Adapt to various JQuery frameworks as needed.
Agile Development:
Participate in Agile development methodologies, particularly Scrum, using Jira/RedMine and Confluence.
API Validation:
Validate Swagger JSON for REST APIs to ensure accuracy and compliance.
Version Control:
Use basic Git commands for version control and collaboration.
Linux Proficiency:
Employ Linux commands for everyday project tasks.
Collaboration and Learning:
Act as a team player, contribute to a collaborative work environment, and continuously seek to enhance skills and knowledge.
-------------------------
JD-14
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-ahmedabad-ellkay-software-private-limited-ahmedabad-surat-vadodara-4-to-9-years-240524008710?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=17&px=1
Role & responsibilities
C# Proficiency: Demonstrated expertise in C# programming language.
Web Application Frameworks: Extensive knowledge of major web application frameworks, particularly .net core,MVC.
Code Quality: Ability to write clear and legible C# code to ensure optimal application performance.
Scalable Design: Strong understanding of fundamental design principles for building scalable applications.
Database Development: Proven experience in developing database schemas that effectively represent and support business operations.
Testing and Quality Assurance: Establishing automated testing platforms and creating comprehensive unit tests.
Version Control: Hands-on experience with code versioning tools, with a focus on Git.
Key Skill – C#, .NET, .NET Version 8, Desing Patterns, SQL, C# developer, Full-stack Developer

Preferred candidate profile
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to design, develop, and deliver high-quality software solutions.
Implement and maintain scalable and efficient C# code.
Design and optimize database schemas to meet business requirements.
Develop and execute automated testing procedures to ensure code reliability.
Collaborate with peers to troubleshoot, debug, and optimize application performance.
Stay updated on emerging technologies and industry trends to contribute innovative ideas.

Note:- Looking for immediate joiner or candidate having less notice period are preferred

Why ELLKAY Software Private Limited?

- Growing company
- 300 dynamic young professionals
- 5 days working
- Competitive salary standards

Company Strength – 300
Working days – Five days a week (WFH is available)
Working hours – 2:00 pm to 11:00 pm

Please share updated CV on Ashwin.Pankhaniya@healthtechindia.com
---------------------------------------------
JD-15
link :-https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-ibaseit-software-pvt-ltd-hyderabad-6-to-9-years-220524008226?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=19&px=1
Full Stack Developer


Location: Hyderabad


We are seeking a skilled Full Stack Developer with a strong background in backend and frontend development, and extensive experience with AWS services. The ideal candidate will have a deep understanding of full stack development, cloud infrastructure, and best practices in software engineering.


Key Responsibilities:

Design, develop, and maintain server-side applications using Node.js.
Integrate and manage AWS services such as EC2, S3, Lambda, RDS, and API Gateway.
Develop and maintain frontend applications using React.js.
Implement and maintain APIs and microservices architecture.
Optimize application performance and ensure scalability and reliability.
Collaborate with UX/UI designers to implement user-friendly interfaces.
Write reusable, testable, and efficient code.
Ensure robust security measures and compliance with best practices.
Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to peers.
Troubleshoot and debug applications.
Maintain comprehensive documentation for all implemented solutions.
Qualifications:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, or a related field (or equivalent experience).
Proven experience as a Full Stack Developer with expertise in Node.js and React.js.
Proficiency in AWS services and cloud architecture.
Strong understanding of JavaScript and frameworks like Express.js.
Experience with RESTful APIs and API development.
Familiarity with database technologies such as MongoDB, DynamoDB, or SQL.
Knowledge of containerization tools like Docker and orchestration with Kubernetes.
Experience with CI/CD pipelines and DevOps practices.
Excellent problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
Strong communication and teamwork abilities.
Preferred Qualifications:

AWS Certified Developer or Solutions Architect.
Experience with serverless architecture.
Familiarity with state management libraries like Redux.
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum methodologies.
Experience with Typescript.
------------------------------------------
JD-16
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-export-genius-new-delhi-5-to-10-years-220524005860?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628&xp=20&px=1
Job Title: Senior Full Stack Developer (React.js/Node.js)
Job Description:
We are looking for an experienced Senior Full Stack Developer proficient in React.js and Node.js to lead the development of dynamic Chrome extensions, dashboards, and websites. The ideal candidate should have a strong background in both front-end and back-end development, as well as the ability to convert Figma designs into React components. This position offers the opportunity to work on challenging projects and collaborate with a talented team of developers to deliver high-quality solutions.


Responsibilities:
1. Lead the development of dynamic Chrome extensions, dashboards, and websites using React.js and Node.js.
2. Responsible to handle job queues, cron jobs and API security.
3. Develop RESTful APIs and integrate front-end components with server-side logic using Node.js.
4. Implement user authentication and authorization mechanisms to ensure data security and access control.
5. Optimize application performance for maximum speed and scalability.
6. Implement automated testing and continuous integration to ensure code quality and reliability.
7. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to gather requirements and define project scope and timelines.
8. Mentor junior developers and provide technical guidance and support as needed.
9. Work closely with designers to convert Figma designs into React components, ensuring pixel-perfect implementation and UI/UX consistency.


Requirements:
1. Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or related field.
2. Minimum of 5 years of experience in full-stack web development with a focus on React.js and Node.js.
3. Strong proficiency in HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
4. Experience with front-end frameworks/libraries such as Redux, Material-UI, or Ant Design.
5. Expertise in building RESTful APIs using Node.js and Express.js.
6. Proficiency in database technologies such as MongoDB, PostgreSQL, or MySQL.
7. Experience with version control systems such as Git.
8. Knowledge of browser extension development and Chrome extension APIs.
9. Experience with converting Figma designs into React components.
10. Excellent problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
11. Strong communication and collaboration skills.
12. Ability to work independently and as part of a team in a fast-paced environment.


Preferred Qualifications:
1. Experience with serverless architectures and cloud platforms such as AWS or Azure.
2. Familiarity with containerization technologies such as Docker and Kubernetes.
3. Knowledge of CI/CD pipelines and deployment automation.
4. Certification in React.js, Node.js, or related technologies.
----------------------------------------
JD-17
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-bitontree-ahmedabad-4-to-6-years-220524005464?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628_1&xp=2&px=2
Job description
Responsibilities:


Collaborate with product managers, designers, and other stakeholders to understand project requirements and translate them into technical specifications.
Design and develop responsive and user-friendly web applications using the latest front-end technologies, such as HTML5, CSS3, JavaScript, and modern frameworks (e.g., React, Angular, or Vue.js).
Develop back-end APIs and services using server-side technologies (e.g., Node.js, Python, Ruby, or Java) to enable seamless data integration and interaction with the front-end.
Create and optimize database schemas and queries to ensure efficient data retrieval and storage.
Implement secure authentication and authorization mechanisms to safeguard user data and application integrity.
Conduct thorough testing of developed features and functionalities to identify and fix bugs and ensure optimal performance.
Stay up-to-date with the latest trends, tools, and technologies in web development and proactively suggest improvements to existing projects.
Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to peers for improving code quality and best practices.
Troubleshoot and resolve issues reported by users, ensuring a smooth user experience.

Requirements:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field.
Proven 4+years of professional experience as a Full Stack Developer.
Experience with relational databases (e.g., MySQL, PostgreSQL, or similar) and ability to write efficient queries.
Knowledge of version control systems (e.g., Git) and code collaboration tools.
Understanding of security principles and best practices in web application development.
Excellent problem-solving and analytical skills, with a keen eye for detail.
Good communication skills and the ability to articulate technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders.
Experience with cloud platforms and services (e.g., AWS, Azure, or Google Cloud) is a plus.
----------------------------------------
JD-18
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-urgent-hiring-full-stack-developer-for-a-us-based-mnc-trajector-india-gurugram-3-to-8-years-020424007805?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628_1&xp=3&px=2
Trajector is seeking a highly talented Software Engineer to build and enhance applications to power our next generation products and workflows. The ideal candidate will have a strong background in software development and experience working with AWS, Node.js, TypeScript, and React.


Responsibilities

Develop and maintain software applications and systems using AWS, Node.js, TypeScript, and React.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define, design, and ship new features
Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code
Troubleshoot and debug mission critical applications directly connected to revenue collection
Participate in code reviews and contribute to the design of software applications.
Mentor and lead junior software engineers by providing guidance and feedback on their work, and helping them to develop their skills.
Continuously discover, evaluate, and implement new technologies to maximize development efficiency

Requirements

Bachelor's or Master's degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field.
At least 4 years of experience in software development, with a focus on backend systems and web applications.
Strong knowledge of Node.js/Express, JavaScript/TypeScript and utilization of AWS-based solutions
Experience working with relational databases such as PostgreSQL or MySQL or a NoSQL database such as MongoDB or DynamoDB.
Strong understanding of software development best practices, such as the utilization of modern design patterns and testing
Experience with Agile development methodologies
Excellent problem-solving, communication, and leadership skills.
Strong analytical abilities and attention to detail.

Preferred Skills & Experience

Experience implementing build/deploy pipelines while working in a CI/CD environment.
Possess expertise in DevOps Research and Assessment (DORA) metrics, including deployment frequency, lead time for changes, change failure rate, and mean time to recover, and adept at utilizing these metrics to continually refine software development practices and optimize team performance.
Experience developing user interfaces using a modern JS/TS framework such as React, Vue.js, Angular or Svelte.
Experience writing and maintaining automated tests
Familiarity with OpenAPI for designing and documenting RESTful APIs.
Proficiency in developing event-driven architectures using tools like Apache Kafka or AWS EventBridge

Interested candidates can share their resume at neha.mehto@TrajectorServices.com
-------------------------------
JD-19
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-bizworkz-pune-3-to-8-years-240524500229?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628_1&xp=5&px=2
Job description
As a Full Stack Developer at bizWorkz, you will be responsible for designing, developing, and maintaining web applications and software solutions that meet the needs of our clients and the objectives of our organization. You will be a key contributor to our development team, working on projects that span both frontend and backend technologies.
Key Responsibilities:
Frontend Development: Utilize your expertise in frontend technologies such as AngularJS, React JS, TypeScript, and more to create responsive and user-friendly web interfaces.
Backend Development: Write server-side code using languages like Python, NodeJS, PHP, Java, and others, ensuring the performance and reliability of web applications.
Database Management: Work with various databases, including MySQL, PostgreSQL, MongoDB, etc., to design, implement, and maintain data storage solutions.
Full Stack Integration: Integrate frontend and backend components to create seamless and efficient web applications.
API Development: Design and develop APIs for internal and external use, ensuring data and functionality are accessible and secure.
Quality Assurance: Perform testing, debugging, and troubleshooting to identify and resolve issues in both frontend and backend components.
Version Control: Use version control systems (e.g., Git) to manage code changes and collaborate with the development team.
Collaboration: Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including designers, product managers, and other developers, to deliver high-quality software solutions.
Qualifications:
A minimum of 3 years of professional experience as a Full Stack Developer.
Strong expertise in frontend technologies like AngularJS, React JS, TypeScript, and related libraries/frameworks.
Proficiency in backend technologies such as Python, NodeJS, PHP, Java, and more.
Experience working with various databases, including MySQL, PostgreSQL, MongoDB, etc.
Solid understanding of API design and development.
Excellent problem-solving and debugging skills.
Knowledge of web security best practices.
Strong teamwork and communication skills.
-----------------------
JD-20
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-leo-software-shimla-2-to-5-years-240524500149?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628_1&xp=6&px=2
Job description
LEO Software is looking for Full-Stack Developer to join our dynamic team and embark on a rewarding career journey

Developing front end website architecture
Designing user interactions on web pages
Developing back-end website applications
Creating servers and databases for functionality
Ensuring cross-platform optimization for mobile phones
Ensuring responsiveness of applications
Working alongside graphic designers for web design features
Seeing through a project from conception to finished product
Designing and developing APIs
Meeting both technical and consumer needs
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Excellent verbal communication skills
Good problem-solving skills
Attention to detail
-------------------------------
JD-21
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-bls-international-delhi-ncr-4-to-7-years-230524010121?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628_1&xp=7&px=2
ob description
Dear Candidate,


We are urgently hiring for Full Stack Developer.


Job Location- Barakhamba Road, Delhi


Interested candidates can share CVs to monalisha.pradhan@blsinternational.com


Role & responsibilities

Writing clean, scalable code
Ability to create high-quality application architecture
Searching for optimal solutions in order to release the highest quality product
Implementing effective cybersecurity solutions and data storage technologies
Understanding of the functioning of web frameworks such as Laravel, CakePHP, CodeIgniter, Symfony or Yii
Develop back-end software applications
Create databases for functionality
Ensure cross-platform optimization for mobile phones
Ensure responsiveness of applications
Work alongside graphic designers for web design features
See-through a project from conception to finished product
Design and develop APIs
Languages & Technologies- React JS, Node JS, PHP ( Codeigniter or Laravel), MySQL, API, AWS OR Azure, GIT


Preferred candidate profile

Ex perience-4+ years as a Full Stack Developer

----------------------
JD-22
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-asp-net-pyhton-a4-technology-solutions-inc-mumbai-all-areas-5-to-10-years-230524006812?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628_1&xp=8&px=2
Job Summary:

We are seeking a skilled and experienced Full Stack Developer to join our dynamic software development team. The ideal candidate will have a strong foundation in ASP.NET Core and Python programming, with extensive experience in developing robust, scalable web applications and services. Proficiency in managing and manipulating databases using SQL Server is essential. This role involves working closely with project managers, UX/UI designers, and other developers to create high-quality software solutions that meet our clients' needs.

Key Responsibilities:

- Design, develop, and maintain efficient, reusable, and reliable code using ASP.NET Core and Python.

- Implement web applications and services with a focus on performance, scalability, and security.

- Work with SQL Server databases to design, develop, and optimize stored procedures, functions, and data models.

- Collaborate with front-end developers to integrate user-facing elements using server-side logic.

- Provide technical support for web applications and resolve issues in a timely manner.

- Participate in code reviews to ensure coding standards, best practices, and avoid potential performance issues.

- Use version control tools, such as GIT, to manage code changes and collaborate with team members.

- Stay up-to-date with emerging trends and technologies in web development, programming languages, and software development tools.

- Document development processes, code, and user guides for internal and external use.

- Work with project managers to estimate development timescales and contribute to project planning.

Required Skills and Qualifications:

- Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, or related field.

- Proven experience as a Full Stack Developer or similar role with a focus on ASP.NET Core and Python.

- Strong understanding of object-oriented programming principles.

- Proficient in SQL Server database management, design, and development.

- Familiarity with front-end technologies (HTML5, CSS3, JavaScript, and frameworks like Angular or React) is a plus.

- Experience with RESTful API development.

- Knowledge of web server configurations (IIS, Nginx, or Apache) and deployment processes.

- Excellent problem-solving skills and ability to work independently or as part of a team.

- Strong communication and interpersonal skills to effectively collaborate with other team members and stakeholders.

 Preferred Skills:

- Experience with cloud services (Azure, AWS, Google Cloud) and deploying applications to the cloud.

- Familiarity with containerization technologies like Docker and Kubernetes.
--------------------------------------
JD-23
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-trichur-sundaram-santhanam-family-chennai-3-to-8-years-170424012328?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628_1&xp=12&px=2
Job description
Role & responsibilities

Work actively with team members to analyze and resolve application issues, and identify defects, discrepancies, and trends by ways of code debugging or log analysis.
Manage incidents and effectively communicate with users, application owners, and senior stakeholders across all areas.
Improve application stability and performance by observing patterns, recurring failures and/or issues, and advise application owners on permanent fixes accordingly.
Adopt various open-source tools to automate failures and notify discrepancies in the health of production and automation of health restoration, with a focus on continuous measurement of risk and cost.

Preferred candidate profile

Experience with developing highly scalable, secure, and resilient applications utilizing Java version 11 +, Spring Core, Spring Boot, REST APIs, JPA, Hibernate, and Swagger
Angular version 13/React, JavaScript, and HTML experience is nice to have
Excellent understanding of security standards, such as OAuth, TLS, JWT etc.
Exposure to the PostgreSQL database is preferred
Experience with even-driven processing utilizing Kafka / Zookeeper is a plus
Hands-on experience with building CICD pipelines using Bitbucket, Maven, Jenkins, SonarQube
Agile software development experience is a must.
The resource should be able to work independently as well as in a team.
Integration of the front-end and back-end aspects of the web application
In-depth knowledge of data structures and algorithms
Troubleshoot, Analyze, debug and fix issues.
Understanding differences between multiple delivery platforms (such as Mobile vs, Desktop), and optimizing output to match the specific platform
Adhere to schedule/ plan and deliver the application as per schedule.
Adhering to SDLC Process
Issue status to be update in Bug tracker until close the issue
Weekly and monthly Reports submitted to respective Manager

- Bug Tracker

- Code Review report

- Development Status summary

- Code commit summary

---------------------------------------
JD-24
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-applied-materials-india-private-limited-chennai-bengaluru-3-to-7-years-150524912685?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628_1&xp=15&px=2
Our Team

A software product development group responsible for ensuring innovative, quality of the mission critical software that we release out to the top semiconductors fab of the world. Intellectual rigor, leveraging latest technology and penchant for satisfying our global customer expectation are our values.

Your Opportunity

As a software engineer,

Seamless exposure to different facets of technologies, and functional areas (development, integration, performance, Quality assurance etc.) without silo can be experienced.
One can envision horizontal growth of development on multiple products and solutions of varying complexity of size, scale, and operations of enterprise level.
Vertical growth through software organization and allied customer fronting roles is possible too.
Roles and Responsibility

Software development Engineer in a Developer role in a software product engineering group.

Develop code for software product development. Involved in every step of software development- Design, development, testing.
Highly skilled in programming with both development and testing.
Active participation in developing high performance software.
Adaptive to full technology stack on fast paced on job learning
Comfortable with Agile development and rapid prototyping
Interfaces with internal customers for requirements analysis.
Troubleshoots software problems of limited difficulty.
Our Ideal Candidate

Experience level 3 - 7 years.
Experience in Angular, JavaScript, HTML5, CSS3 will be an added advantage.
Extensive and expert programming experience in at least one general programming language (e.g. C#, Python, C++) & tech stack to write maintainable, scalable, unit-tested code.
Knowledge in multithreading, Inter Process Communication techniques like WCF, gRPC, REST.
Production debugging is a plus.
Strong analytical skills, strong oral and written communication skills
Strong problem-solving and troubleshooting skills.
Ability to work independently.
Shows agility and flexibility in taking assignments.
Design thinking
Able to come up with a proper design for any requirement.
End-to-end delivery ownership Technically sound Find and implement the right solution Breakdown high-level tasks into multiple sub-tasks Follow proper coding standards Communication.
Need to frequently discuss with stakeholders in other regions.
Effectively communicate with team members
Qualifications

Bachelors Degree in engineering, subject to the condition that aspirants have a strong fundamental in Software Engineering and have proven ability to comprehend and synthesize solutions using programing constructs/ techniques, as deem it appropriate for the situation.

-----------------------------------
JD-25
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-hiring-for-full-stack-developer-angular-xoriant-pune-chennai-7-to-12-years-180524005708?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628_1&xp=16&px=2
Job Description :

10-12+ years of hands-on experience in building an enterprise scale highly componentized application using SpringBoot, Angular, Angular elements, CLI, Webpack, Schematics
• Recent experience with modern UI development using Angular v10+
• Experience working with Micro-services utilizing REST.
• Experience with design and implementations of cloud-ready applications and deployment pipelines on large-scale container platform clusters is a plus.
• Experience working in a Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery environment and familiar with Tekton, Harness, Jenkins, Code Quality/Style Tools - EsLint, etc.
• Proficient in industry standard best practices such as Design Patterns, Coding Standards, Coding modularity, Prototypes etc.
• Experience working with Java, SpringBoot, Java Script framework such as Reactive Programming concepts (RxJs), Angular10+, TypeScript, SCSS and HTML5
• Experience in debugging, tuning and optimizing UI components.
• Understanding of the SDLC lifecycle for Agile & Waterfall methodologies
• Excellent written and oral communication skills
• Experience developing application in Financial Services industry is preferred.
• Experience in managing and implementing successful projects.
• Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
• Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
• Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
• Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication.
Skills: (technical skills)

Java, Databases SQL/NO SQL, Scripting – Unix, Spring & Spring Boot frameworks, Microservices, API development, UI – Angular, Javascript, Typescript
Qualifications: (degree/certifications)
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
• Master’s degree preferred. Competencies (soft skills you are looking for in a candidate)
---------------------------------------------------------
JD-26
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-infosys-hyderabad-chennai-bengaluru-6-to-11-years-150524005906?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628_1&xp=17&px=2
In the role of Full Stack Developer, you will interface with key stakeholders and apply your technical proficiency across different stages of the Software Development Life Cycle including Requirements Elicitation, Application Architecture definition and Design. You will play an important role in creating the high level design artifacts. You will also deliver high quality code deliverables for a module, lead validation for all types of testing and support activities related to implementation, transition and warranty. You will be part of a learning culture, where teamwork and collaboration are encouraged, excellence is rewarded, and diversity is respected and valued.


Locations for this position are India (Mangalore, Bangalore, Bhubaneswar, Chennai, Hyderabad).


Qualifications Basic

Bachelors degree or foreign equivalent required from an accredited institution. Will also consider three years of progressive experience in the specialty in lieu of every year of education.
At least 8 years of experience in Information Technology and minimum 3 yrs. Experience in various aspects of full stack development - Front End & Backend, and would be capable of solving problems and programing across the stack.

Mandatory Skillsets:

Full stack development with experience in React + Redux, Node.js and Amazon Web Services

Detailed skill expectations

Front end development experience
Typically, 8+ years of experience of development experience on User Interface areas with HTML, HTML5, XHTML, DOM, CSS, CSS3, JavaScript, jQuery, AJAX and JSON
Atleast 3 years of Experience in ReactJS, Redux and related frameworks of front-end technologies including automated unit testing scripts;
Experience in developing web page quickly and effectively using jQuery, HTML5, CSS3, Responsive Web Design, Bootstrap
Experience in React js, Redux or Angular 2/4 frameworks, Webpack
Experience in Testing frameworks: Enzyme, Mocha chai, Karma
Usage of version control tools like GitHub and experience in using CI tools like Jenkins
Experience in Build and automation tools like Grunt, Gulp
Experience in developing apps focused on accessibility (ADA compatibility)
Back end development experience
Experience in working with Nodejs
Good understanding of Domain driven architecture and standards
Experience with Amazon web services and cloud platform services integrations
Experience in working with REST, SOAP services integration
Experience with relational and no-relational database structures SQL/NoSQL (Mongo DB..)

Other Relevant Experience

Experience in software development life cycle
Knowledge on testing framework - develops and tests program units, automation testing
Working in an agile environment, works on new systems development and enhancement/maintenance of existing systems
Participates in implementations of new systems or modifications to existing systems to meet Information Systems and client business requirements.
Experience with page speed testing and optimization techniques.
Developing applications meeting web standards, best practices and current trends.
Ability to work in team in diverse/ multiple stakeholder environment
Preferred - Experience in Financial Services, Insurance Domain
Experience and desire to work in a Global delivery environment
Knowledge on Microservices Architecture, cloud based Infrastructure, modular architecture
Understanding of Continuous Integration and DevOps
-----------------------------------
JD-27
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-full-stack-developer-ibm-india-pvt-limited-bengaluru-5-to-10-years-130524907071?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628_1&xp=18&px=2
Your Role and Responsibilities
We are looking for a developer highly interested in developing an innovative, future-oriented solution that automates and simplifies the installation, configuration and testing of Linux on Z systems.
Your main duties will include design and implementation of new features, optimizing and maintaining existing code and ensuring the software meets high-quality standards through testing and debugging. You will also work closely with the customers to ensure the software meets their needs.

Step in and be part of IBM System Development Lab community, outstanding for its innovation and team spirit, offering one of the broadest project portfolios of hardware and software technologies within the IBM Corporation.

Engineers in our team work inside a highly agile development environment and are responsible for the full software development life cycle- ranging from designing and implementing of the new product features, testing for industry-leading quality assurance over to continuous product delivery as well as supporting our global customers. You should be thrilled by emerging technologies with our software products for future Mainframe and Cloud-based markets.

What you will do Are you interested in developing automation tools and Open Source? Your favorite operating system is Linux? Would you like to be part of an Open Source community and do you intend to build up a reputation as an Open Source maintainer? Are you passionate about bringing in your expertise and developing your career in an International Agile development culture?
If so, our team is the right place for you!

Our Linux infrastructure automation development team is responsible for providing tools to automate the installation of Linux distributions. The tools manage relationships between Z datacenter resources and allocate them to specific projects and users according to a role-based schema and use HMC API to control LPARs, Terminal for z/VM and ssh for KVM-based installations.
Further they support running Ansible playbooks on installed systems and include them into existing pipelines to be part of continuous release process. The automation tools enable developers and testers to effortlessly bring up their environments without necessitating a deep understanding of the IBM Z platform.

Required Technical and Professional Expertise
5+ years of Working experience as a Full Stack Developer
Strong background in Software development with indepth knowledge of C/C++ with expertise in Python backend applications, Flask, PostgreSQL, SQLAlchemy, designing REST API, distributed services.
Strong development skills in rust (maintaining a Rust codebase, maintaining Rust packages using Cargo)
Experience with React frontend (Typescript, React, SPA, webpack, backend API consumption)
Strong Core Linux Development skills (git, shell, containers and orchestration, system monitoring, CI/CD pipelines, integration and end-to-end tests, playbooks and process automation, network segmentation)
Experience with deployment on OpenShift
A Self-starter Individual with excellent problem-solving skills, able to work independently and as a part of the team.
Broad and proven know-how in database technology and practical experience in software development and agile methodology
Good Project management skills (iteration or other agile flavours, cross-team coordination, aligning with customer goals)
Good Community management skills (working with open source contributors, client outreach and other public relations)
Strong Technical leadership skills (achieving excellence through code quality and practices, architecture decisions, innovation)
Strong English communication skills both written and Verbal


Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
3+ years of experience in open source development using rust
3+ years of experience in python development
3+ years of experience in zLinux operating systems and virtualization/hypervisor
Expert level skills in source code repository systems (e.g. git), scripting languages (e.g. Python) and test Automation skills
Strong English communication skills both written and Verbal
-------------------------
JD-28
link :- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-opportunity-full-stack-developer-lead-schneider-electric-bengaluru-6-to-11-years-130524004735?src=seo_srp&sid=17165534176433628_1&xp=20&px=2
Knowledge and Skills – Required
Developers who have built responsive front-end applications communicating via REST services to a backend.
Expertise in JavaScript, Angular JS, HTML5, CSS3, jQuery, Bootstrap.
Ability to build blindingly simple interfaces for hybrid mobile apps.
Developers who understand the intricacies and insanity of cross-browser development.
Pairing with UX designers to build out design concepts and interactive prototypes
Ability to produce clean, semantic HTML, CSS, and Javascript.
Good understanding of asynchronous request handling, partial page updates, and AJAX
Experience in communicating with REST-based service APIs.
Pairing with developers to ensure that the presentation layer is implemented in accordance with the best above best practices and UX specifications
Experience in working on Agile with SCRUM is a big plus.

Desired Skills
Experience working with other JavaScript frameworks and libraries.
Experience working with Java.
Good understanding of Object-Oriented Programming concepts and logic.
Basic knowledge of image authoring tools, to be able to crop, resize, or perform small adjustments on an image. Familiarity with tools such as Gimp or Photoshop is a plus.
Experience in developing design tools is a plus
---------------------------------------------------
JD-29
link :-https://wellfound.com/jobs/3016026-full-stack-developer
About the Position:

As a full stack engineer, focusing primarily on the backend, you'll be working with other engineers to further develop and architect our search and merchandizing as a service product.

The TypeScript backend is responsible for several microservices, from managing the product configuration to integration with various platforms. The main database is PostgreSQL, and we also use cool tech such as Apache Pulsar.
On the frontend we have our main Backoffice dashboard written in vue.js and we develop and maintain integrations for our customers ecommerce stores as a react based SDK and more recently also packaged natively for specific platforms such as Shopify.
We are an empowered product team, committed to collaborative problem solving. We write specs and share the decision making. We work in two-week sprints to deliver greatness.
What you’ll be responsible for:

Designing and writing maintainable, readable and elegant code, rearchitecting and refactoring existing software where needed
Contributing to technical and product specs, and collaborating on architecture and design decisions together with the other stakeholders
Embracing feedback on your specs and your code as an opportunity for continuous improvement and collaborative design, and carrying out spec and code review for your coworkers
Testing the software you build for reliability and robustness using different testing paradigms and libraries
What you’ll need to bring to Maropost:

Have at least 5 years experience with backend javascript frameworks (we useNode/Nest with TypeScript)
Have some experience with frontend frameworks/libraries (we use ReactJS and VueJS)
Appreciate well-designed APIs and can contribute to their design (REST or GraphQL, we use both)
Have some experience working with markup languages (e.g. HTML/CSS)
Understand and work with modern cloud native infrastructure (we use AWS/GCP)
Appreciate good developer experience and make ours even better by introducing new tools and iterating on processes
Are generous with your communication, whether it is about new ideas, praise, or very kindly phrased constructive feedback
Like to learn new things, have an open mind and want to share your knowledge with your coworkers
Are an effective technical and non-technical communicator (our company language is English)
---------------------------------------------------------
JD-30
link :- https://wellfound.com/jobs/2839721-full-stack-developer
The Role
Mercle Network is all about a data layer that aggregates identity and reputation information for Internet . The focus is on user control and privacy: individuals can manage their data in their own vaults(private or public), choosing what to share or keep private. These vaults work across different blockchain platforms, making the data versatile and interoperable.

Attestations work as the building blocks for storing information about any users; We have categories this data into two parts: Public data (attestations which can be stored publicly) and Private Data (Sensitive data information about the user). The public data attestations are stored on the decentralized IPFS network, while private sensitive data can be stored on a private database or on the user's device locally, which can be later shareable through zero-knowledge proofs. This approach allows any entity on the internet to issue attestation to other users relative to them. to issue to solve real-world problems for Dapps, DAOs, and various online platforms by offering reliable, authenticated data. It enables new ways to manage access control, distribute rewards, and facilitate governance, among other utilities.

Our product is in use by Polygon, ShapeShift, Powerloom, Router, Gnars and many more.

What we're looking for
We are looking for a full stack engineer who is excited by both the premise of the product and the crypto/web3 space at large. You are eager to learn and build on the codebase to secures access to infrastructure for the leading DAOs of the world. Interest to discuss the product features and technical implementation is a must as to ensure we ship the most impactful solution.

What you will achieve
You'll work with the core team to build new product features from start to finish: through conception, research, implementation, and maintenance.
You'll participate in backend architecture decisions and guide team members in technical knowledge with best practices.
You'll implement state of the art multi-chain web3 user experiences and actively learn about the latest developments in web3.
Technical Requirements
Occasionally contribute to front-end development.
Debug and troubleshoot issues.
Write documentation with respect to the APIs and applications they build.
Perform frequent code reviews.
Experienced leader: You have worked at product based companies for more than 2 years, as a full stack developer specializing in the MERN stack (MongoDB, Express.js, React.js, Node.js). You have worked on both frontend and backend extensively to ship MVP ready products with features.
Familiarity with technologies: You're well versed with AWS technologies, JavaScript, Node.js, MySQL, React.js, and have a good understanding of MongoDB and Express.js.
Thoughtful problem-solving: You have the ability to break down a problem until you get a clear and accurate understanding of the context.
Non-Technical Requirements
Demonstrated experience working in small to medium development teams.
Passion for the “future of work.”
Self-motivated and comfortable working with remote-first teams.
Commitment to the Web3 ethos.
Nice to have
You participate in open source projects and web3 hackathons, or write about web3 technology.
You have experience in backend integration testing and in debugging performance issues.
Benefits
Competitive compensation in cash and equity.
Support for a fully remote role and culture, with periodic reimbursed travel for the team to meet together.
Significant room for advancement into a leadership role with equity stake.
20 days + public holidays PTO.
Health insurance.
------------------------------------------------------------------


1. Full Stack Developer 

Responsibilities:

Assist in developing frontend components and features, guided by senior engineers.
Collaborate with multidisciplinary teams to implement user interface designs, ensuring optimal user experience.
Contribute to improving application performance and responsiveness.
Engage in code reviews, advocating for best practices and maintaining high-quality standards.
Acquire and apply industry-standard methodologies and tools in frontend and backend development.


Qualifications:

Enrollment or recent graduation from a Computer Science, Engineering, or related degree program.
Worked on Java, Springboot
worked on Angular or React.js or Next.js
Made any Open Source Contribution
Basic understanding of web development principles and technologies.
Experience with JavaScript, HTML, and CSS.
Exposure to REST APIs is Plus
Demonstrated problem-solving capabilities and meticulous attention to detail.
Strong communication skills, capable of effectively interacting with team members.
Self-motivated with the ability to work both independently and as part of a team.
A strong desire to learn, adapt, and apply new technologies and overcome challenges.

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3934977616


2. Full Stack Developer

Role Description

This is a full-time remote role for a Software Engineer (Fresher). The Software Engineer will be responsible for daily tasks related to computer science, back-end web development, software development, programming, and object-oriented programming (OOP). The role involves collaborating with interdisciplinary teams, participating in software design and development, writing and maintaining code, and contributing to the overall success of the projects assigned.


Qualifications

Strong knowledge and understanding of computer science principles
knowledge in Front-end & back-end web development such as React and python
Proficiency in programming languages
Expertise in object-oriented programming (OOP) concepts
Good problem-solving and analytical skills
Ability to work independently and as part of a team
Excellent communication and collaboration skills
Experience with Agile/Scrum methodologies is a plus
Bachelor's or Master's degree in Computer Science or a related field


https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3931677388


3. Full Stack Developer

 Role Description
 
This is a full-time remote role for a Software Engineer at Xampus. As a Software Engineer, you will be responsible for developing and maintaining software applications, writing clean and efficient code, debugging and troubleshooting issues, and collaborating with cross-functional teams to deliver high-quality products. You will also participate in code reviews, contribute to technical design discussions, and provide technical support.

 Qualifications
 
Strong knowledge of Computer Science principles and concepts
Experience in Back-End Web Development and Software Development
Proficiency in Programming languages such as Java, Python, or C++
Familiarity with Object-Oriented Programming (OOP) principles
 
Relevant skills and qualifications that would be beneficial for this role include:

 
Experience with web frameworks such as Spring or Django
Knowledge of database systems and SQL
Experience with version control systems like Git
Strong problem-solving and analytical skills
Excellent communication and collaboration abilities
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3931619096

4. 

What You’ll Need: 

3+ years of experience in C# and/or .NET Frameworks is a must-to-have.
Demonstrated experience applying common Object-Oriented Design patterns to design and implement web-based software with STRONG Coding skills
3 + years of experience developing web services such as RESTful, Angular, Cloud (AWS)
3 years of experience working with databases, preferably with MS SQL or other technologies such as MySQL, PostgreSQL SQL, MongoDB etc.
Working experience in Angular 12 would be an advantage
Key contributor to successful product releases
A passion for working on all tiers (web, services, data)
Experience working with dynamic Agile teams and driving results
Comfortable working across teams and presenting work topics
Flexibility in working with Hybrid Model
You’ll Get To:

Rapidly prototype, deploy, and test new solutions within our market
Build out scalable solutions to manage events and real-time status of close to a million independent devices
Own and operate scalable production services and user interface
Full stack engineering and development
Develop and test new solutions that enhance our position within our markets.
Passionate about learning and helping others


https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3919346376

5. 

Required skillsets:



- Collaborate closely with cross-functional teams to conceptualize, design, and develop a user-friendly web platform.
- Implement robust authentication mechanisms to ensure data security and client privacy.
- Design and develop a client-friendly panel for reviewing and downloading test results.
- Choose and implement appropriate frameworks such as Vue or React to enhance the user experience.
- Develop the back-end infrastructure using either plain Python or a lightweight framework like FastAPI.
- Ensure seamless integration of all components for a cohesive and smooth user experience.
- Conduct thorough testing and debugging to identify and rectify issues before deployment.
 
*Required Experience:

- Proficiency in Python and JavaScript, with a strong understanding of their ecosystems and libraries.
- Proficiency in PHP with knowledge of Laravel 

- Experience with front-end frameworks such as React or Vue for creating dynamic user interfaces.
- Familiarity with Pandas for data manipulation and analysis.
- Solid understanding of authentication mechanisms and best practices for data security.
- Previous experience with Postgresql or similar relational databases.
- Effective communication and collaboration skills to work seamlessly within a team.
- Proven ability to deliver high-quality code in a timely manner.
 
*Nice to haves:

- Knowledge of AWS services, specifically S3, for cloud-based storage solutions.
- Experience in semiconductor or related industries.

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3926450686


6.

Position Overview:



We are seeking a talented Full Stack Engineer (mid-level or above) with a passion for creating exceptional AI-first solutions. You will work directly with our founders and users to define the product and engineering roadmap, own major features, and mentor other engineers.


Key Responsibilities:

Work with founders and users to define product and engineering roadmap.
Own major features from development to deployment.
Build AI-first user experiences.
Mentor engineers and contribute to a culture of technical excellence.
Influence product roadmap and company strategy.


Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree or higher in a relevant field.
Minimum 3+ years of software development experience.
Skilled in TypeScript, React, Node.js, Postgres, and backend patterns like NextJS, Express, or FastAPI.
Familiarity with Python, LLMs, and frameworks like LangChain.

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3920053012


7.

Responsibilities:
- You will build tools and platforms to fully integrate and on-board LinkedIn’s API products for its consumers
- You will scale distributed applications, make architectural trade-offs applying synchronous and asynchronous design patterns, write code, and deliver with speediness and quality.
- You will develop multi-tier scalable, high-volume performing, and reliable user-centric applications that operate 24x7.
- You will produce high quality software that is unit tested, code reviewed, and checked in regularly for continuous integration.
- You will provide technical leadership, driving and performing best engineering practices to initiate, plan, and execute large-scale, cross functional, and company-wide critical programs
- You will identify, leverage, and successfully evangelize opportunities to improve engineering productivity
- You will mentor junior engineers and interns in the team

Basic Qualifications:

- BS in Computer Science or related technical field involving coding

- 2+ years of hands on web development experience with object-oriented JavaScript, jQuery, semantic HTML, CSS.

- Experience with developing backend services in Java.


Preferred Qualifications:

- 3+ years of relevant work experience.

- MS or PhD in Computer Science or related technical discipline.

- Experience writing clean JavaScript including experience with modern frameworks (Angular/Ember/React) and debugging tools (Chrome Dev Tools, etc).

- Prior experience building public API's with Java, working with RESTful APIs or GraphQL.

- Prior experience with building external API management platforms

- Knowledge of (and a passion for) current trends and best practices in front-end architecture, including performance, accessibility, security and usability.

- Experienced in Unit / Integration / Visual Testing.

- Experience with JSP and Dust programming is a plus.

- Ability and eagerness to program progressive, single-page applications (Backbone / Angular/ Play framework).

Suggested Skills:
• Data Structures & Algorithms
• HTML/CSS
• Javascript
• Javascript Build Tools
• UI Framework experience such as React

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3881985448


8.

What are we looking for:

We are looking for strong engineering leaders, with the ability to lead a group of highly motivated and high performing engineers to amazing outcomes. We are looking for engineer who themself is great at execution as well as take up ownership of delivery with a singular focus of - "Getting things done" - in the best way possible.
We believe good product engineering is not just about having good team but also but about having good engineering processes. We are looking for someone who helps us build the processes as we need to scale.
Requirements:

Bachelor's/Masters or Ph.D. degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics or related discipline is NOT MANDATORY. Skills and passion to build products that people love are mandatory. :)
Minimum 4 years of working experience.
Firm grasp of the JavaScript language and its nuances, including ES6+ syntax
Full-stack experience working with backend programming languages as we believe engineers can do anything and everything and so everyone at Emitrr works full-stack.
Knowledge of Node.js/GoLang and frameworks available for it {{such as Express, Nest, etc depending on your technology stack}}
Good understanding of React.js and its core principles with experience with working on popular React.js workflows (such as Flux or Redux)
Expertise in Database modeling, preferably relational DB, spotting DB bottlenecks and writing optimized DB queries
Expertise in common Cloud technologies, AWS/GCP Knowledge of CI/CD tools and workflows
Knowledge in one or more of the following: NoSQL (especially, but not only Redis), Queueing system experience (Kafka, RabbitMQ, ActiveMQ, MSMQ)


https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3917524321


9.

What You'll Do

Play a key role in developing our Design System, serving designers and engineers across the entire organisation.
Implement concepts, user experiences, and user interfaces in our design system.
Collaborate closely with the designers in your team and support them in finding the best solution for every component.
Teach us what we don't know and how you want to improve our Design System to cater towards the needs of designers and engineers.
Take ownership of initiatives in your team from concept to delivery. Be a technical mentor and help the team grow.


Who you are



You have at least 5+ years of strong hands-on experience as a frontend engineer in a fast-paced organisation.
Multiple years of demonstrated experience working on large-scale design systems
Experience working in a cross-functional team together with product management, designers, and engineers.
Deep understanding of web technologies: HTML, CSS, and JavaScript, as well as modern frontend frameworks.
You previously worked with technologies like lit or stencil to create web components.
You have extensive experience in testing and documenting design systems for a technical audience.
Ability to learn quickly, iterate, unblock yourself, and persist until the right problem is solved.
You understand and live agile workflows and lean principles in your day-today work.
Experience working on cloud platforms like AWS, Google Cloud, or Azure. Experience working with third-party system APIs and web services (especially GraphQL).
Excellent communication skills in written and spoken English, the ability to present confidently to technical and non-technical stakeholders.




We'd Particularly Love It If



You have extensive experience with Lit.
You have experience working in open-source communities or standards development.
Experience in Backend-Development in Programming Languages like Python or GO.
Ability to understand common UX patterns and to identify and mitigate UX design risks early in the development process
Able to demonstrate knowledge of front-end system design, interaction with backend APIs, and performance/security considerations.


https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3921753343


10.

What's in it for you ?



Build, manage, and scale large-scale applications and infrastructure.
Impact and connect business problems to technical problems.
Design and develop high-volume, low-latency applications for mission-critical systems and delivering high availability and performance.
Collaborate within your product streams and team to bring best practices and leverage a world-class tech stack.
Set quantifiable objectives that encapsulate quality attributes of a system.
Set up every essential (tracking/alerting) to make sure the infrastructure/software you built is working as expected.


We would love to hear from you if you:



Have 3-6 years of strong software(application or infrastructure) development experience and software engineering skills.
Possesses deep expertise and hands-on experience with advanced javascript frameworks: ReactJS, ExpressJS, etc.
Are fluent in responsive design and mobile/tablet UX/UI.
Know UI testing automation frameworks.
Have experience with graphQL, relay, and micro-frontend.
Have a practical knowledge of databases (redis/postgres or any graphDB).
Have a working knowledge of AWS, docker, and Kubernetes.

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3918701758


11.

Responsibilities:

Develop new user-facing features
Build reusable code and libraries for future use
Define code architecture decisions to support a high-performance and scalable product with a minimal footprint
Address and improve any technical issues.
Collaborate well with engineers, researchers, and data implementation specialists to design and create advanced, elegant, and efficient systems.


Required Candidate profile:

Proficient understanding NodeJs Frameworks like Express etc...
Proficient understanding of SQL queries.
Good understanding of CSS pre-processing platforms, such as LESS, SASS etc.
Proficient understanding of client-side scripting and JavaScript frameworks like Angular.
Good understanding of Angular, Angular Material is required.
Knowledge of AWS services like Lambda, API Gateway, SNS, SQS, Cloudwatch is a plus.
Consumer Web Development Experience for High-Traffic, Public Facing web applications.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Proficient understanding of code versioning tools, such as Git
At least 1 plus years of experience in NodeJs, Express, PostgresSql / MySql, Angular 2+.

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3913819976

12.

Job Roles and Responsibilities

- Develop and maintain full stack web applications using ReactJS/NextJS 

- Collaborate with the AI research team to integrate AI technologies into the web applications
- Optimize applications for maximum speed and scalability
- Implement security and data protection measures
- Stay updated on emerging technologies and best practices in full stack development


Cultural Expectations

- Collaborate closely with a small team to innovate in AI research
- Demonstrate a passion for creating photorealistic images
- Embrace a fast-paced, dynamic startup environment
- Communicate effectively and proactively within the team and with stakeholders

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3912937575


13.


Job Description

In this role, you will:

 Collaborate with system engineers, frontend developers and software developers to implement solutions that are aligned with and extend shared platforms and solutions
 Apply principles of SDLC and methodologies like Lean/Agile/XP, CI, Software and Product Security, Scalability, Documentation Practices, refactoring and Testing Techniques
 Writes codes that meets standards and delivers desired functionality using the technology selected for the project
 Build features such as web services and Queries on existing tables
 Understand performance parameters and assess application performance
 Work on core data structures and algorithms and implement them using language of choice

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3930779383

14.

Job Description:

Job Title:

Ful Stack .Net Developer

Position Type:

Full-Time

Department/Group:

IT

Location:

Chennai

Job Description

What we’re looking for from you: Web Developer / Full Stack Software Engineer (JavaScript C# .Net Core)

Would you like to work on cutting edge premium care support products and progress your career within a friendly and informal environment?

Joining a talented team as a Web Developer you will design and develop our next wave of flagship products. Equally maintaining our existing software application stack.

Responsibilities as a Web Developer will include producing fully functional, clean code; integration of backend data; UI and web layout design; as well as de-bugging and bug-fixes. You will be working across the full stack using a range of web technologies including JavaScript and HTML / CSS as well as C# .Net Core, ASP.Net MVC, and MySQL.

Driven by technology this company can offer a remote interview/onboarding process. You’ll be joining a diverse team, working in a relaxed software house environment, in Hewish offices with some continued flexibility.

Role and Responsibilities

As a .NET Developer/Software Developer you will be proactive in the architecture, design, and development of current and future products and participate in the formation and delivery of technical and development processes.

You will work independently and collaboratively and will be expected to translate functional and technical requirements to robust, scalable, and maintainable code for mobile, web, and desktop applications developed for cloud infrastructure. You will participate in the design and development of User Interfaces, database models and database architecture. You will participate in peer reviewing code and aid in establishing a culture of best practices.

The ideal candidate will have the motivation and technical capability to continuously learn new and emerging technologies, techniques, and soft skills while establishing credibility and trust with key stakeholders.

Required Skills

C# /.Net Framework
HTML/CSS/JS front-end
SQL (MySQL)
SOLID Principals / Object Oriented Analysis / Object Oriented Design
Unit Testing: NUnit, xUnit, MSTest, etc
Software Development Principals: Proficient in software development principles, methodologies, architectural patterns, and design patterns
Integrating with external programs via API’s using XML/JSON
Experienced in producing standards-compliant, performant and accessible websites. 
Able to work effectively and efficiently, including working to a deadline and across multiple projects simultaneously. 

Desirable Skills

Microservice Architecture
REST APIs
.NET Core
UX design experience
AWS
DevOps Principals: Good understanding of CI and CD Principals and Tools
Knowledge of frameworks such as Angular and or React
Git and GitHub
Mongo or NoSQL equivalent
Jira

Education & Experience

6+ Years of experience as a Developer

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3907550396



15.

Core Responsibilities

Build scalable cloud-based web applications (Python, Java, Django, JavaScript, React.js )
Own feature design, build, and implementation from end to end
Create innovative solutions to complex data-driven problems
Participate in code and design reviews
Collaborate with our HQ team on exciting new releases

What It Takes To Be Successful

A BE/BS degree is required
5-7 years developing experience (Python, Django, Scala, Impala, Javascript)
A working understanding SaaS and Cloud Computing concepts
Familiarity with Big Data, Machine Learning, and Artificial Intelligence concepts
Eagerness to learn (platform training will be provided)
Passion for the code you write and pride in making it maintainable and scalable


https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3780193600


16.

 
Major Responsibilities

Work closely with developers, architects, product managers, business analysts, and other stakeholders to deliver projects in accordance with Agile principles.
Partner with architects to document detailed solution design based on Chubb and industry standard architecture.
Ensure high quality code that meets business objectives, quality standards and secure web development guidelines.
Manage project stakeholder expectations and issue communications on progress.
React to shifting priorities without compromising deadlines and momentum.


Minimum Requirements

3+ years of software engineering experience.
Expertise in MEAN (Mongo/Express/Angular/Node) is a must.
Experience in development of REST based APIs using Open API specification and/or creating specifications with Swagger
Experience in one of the prominent cloud platforms is a must. (Azure preferred).
Experience applying Machine Learning techniques is a huge plus.
Experience in P&C Insurance is a huge plus.

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3921818833


17.

Essential Responsibilities

Has excellent communication
Strategize and problem-solve with the rest of our development team
Manage time efficiently
Utilize the apps and services our team uses to communicate on a persistent, ongoing basis


Basic Qualifications

Minimum 2-3 years of full-stack application development
Having prior Freelance/start-up experience is highly valued
Proficiency in JavaScript/Node.js and frameworks such as React.
Knowledge of DevOps (AWS suite) is a strong plus.
Are skilled in UI Development technologies such as HTML, CSS, JSON, and API usage
Have an interest in, understanding of, or experience with Design Thinking Methodology
Have an interest in, understanding of, or experience with Agile development methodology.
Enthusiastic and energetic about solving the problems we face
Highly motivated, self-starter with a goal-oriented personality
Team player
Experienced carrying a high workload in a high-pressure, fast-paced work environment and relentlessly focused on the impact
Excellent written and verbal skills

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3778810753


18.

About the role: 
Mode of job: Remote

This is for a full-stack developer role. The ideal candidate will be responsible for solutioning and implementing the backend architecture, and/or frontend UI + UX of the exchange greex is working on. They will also be responsible for designing and implementing testable and scalable code. A major part of this would be working with database and caching technologies such as redis, postgresql, Kafka, and languages such as C, Rust, NodeJs, Golang, and Next JS. The work will overlap with analytics about options trading and strategies thereof.


Culture:

People at greex are highly motivated and enthusiastic. We treat every challenge like a learning opportunity and try to create the greatest & easiest possible trading experience for traders. We treat every team member with respect and have no hierarchy - anyone can bring ideas & deliver them into the hands of real everyday traders. 



Responsibilities:

Create APIs and implementation of software architecture using NodeJS, Go Lang, and/or Rust.
Work with the team to design and create architecture & implementations of features & enhancements in the exchange
Implement clean, performant, and dynamic frontend UI and UX in Next JS
Discover and fix programming bugs
Understand performance and reliability issues and solve them with the team
Design scalable, testable code
Collaborate with team members & other people in the organization to understand customer needs and help create the best possible experience for traders.


Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelors of Engineering or similar in computer science engineering degree
Great understanding of data structures and algorithmic system design
1.5+ years of development experience with programming languages - NodeJS, ReactJS, NextJS & GoLang/C/Rust
1.5+ years of experience in using databases such as MongoDB or SQL in programs, as well as natively
Understanding of web architectures, HTTP requests, sockets & server architecture
Knowledge & passion for trading & cryptocurrency markets


Preferred Qualifications:

UI and UX skills and frontend development
Good mathematical and statistical skills
REST APIs, Websockets, Socket.IO
Distributed frameworks such as Kafka, Flink, Spark
Comfortable working in flexible team sizes and taking work ownership

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3884856456


19.

Roles and Responsibilities

Backend Development: Design, develop, and maintain robust backend systems using Node.js, Express.js, and NestJS.
Frontend Integration: Collaborate with front-end developers to integrate user-facing elements with server logic.
API Development: Architect and implement RESTful APIs to ensure seamless communication between frontend and backend systems.
Performance Optimization: Enhance application performance and scalability using efficient coding, caching, and database optimizations.
Database Management: Develop and maintain database schemas, queries, and data models, primarily using AWS RDS or similar technologies.
Troubleshooting: Identify and resolve complex issues across the full technology stack, from frontend UI adjustments to backend service fixes.
‍


Ideal Candidate Profile

Educational Background: Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field.
Backend Expertise: 2 to 3 years of professional experience with a strong focus on backend development using Node.js.
Excellent problem-solving capabilities, analytical mindset, and attention to detail.
‍


Technical Skills Required

Proficient in JavaScript, including ES6+ features.
Experienced with Node.js frameworks like Express.js and NestJS.
Skilled in frontend development with React.js and Next.js.
Knowledgeable about AWS services, particularly RDS.
Solid understanding of relational databases, SQL queries, and optimizations.
Familiar with version control systems, such as Git.

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3929017767

20.

What you’ll be doing:

As a Full Stack Engineer at ByteBrew, you’ll be a vital part of the core engineering team that builds dynamic, easy-to-use and performant dashboard experiences for thousands of game developers using ByteBrew everyday. The innovative work you do as a team member on ByteBrew, will be utilized by thousands of games that reach billions of users across the globe.


You’ll work directly with the engineering team to:

Build easy-to-use SaaS dashboard experiences
Design, build, and optimize the analytical queries using complex data science methods
Build impactful visual insights using different table, chart and graphing libraries
Be creative and collaborate with other team members to create streamlined and performant analytical queries
Continuously improve and build upon the current architecture of our dashboard to optimize user workflows
Utilize languages and frameworks such as: React, Vue, Javascript, HTML, CSS, and SQL
Communicate and support the ByteBrew developer community with technical support towards the product




We’re looking for someone with:

3+ years experience in the following languages: Javascript, SQL.
2+ years in software development building web apps or dashboards using React and/or Vue.
1+ years experience building applications with HTML and CSS.
Deployed microservices with Cloud Providers like GCP, AWS, Azure; using containers for Kubernetes or other app services.
Worked with RESTful web services and handled user session states across webapps/backends.
Used one or more of the following NoSQL databases: Google Datastore, MongoDB.
Used one or more of the following Data Warehouses: Hadoop, Redshift, BigQuery.
Built custom authentication and session stores, or have utilized Auth0, Okta, or Firebase Auth.


Bonus:

Developed or worked on games, game development, mobile apps or game engines
Knowledge in ML or predictive analytics
Used automated test frameworks (e.g. Jest, Mocha, Jasmine)

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3921609596


21.

.NET Developer with Azure and Angular (4-6 Years of Experience)



Responsibility:
 
Able to adapt to changing project conditions.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to gather and analyze requirements, develop technical solutions, and implement new features.
Application development experience using .Net Technologies (C#, .Net Core)
Web API development experience using .Net Core
Experience in Azure Services
Write unit tests and conduct code reviews to ensure code quality and reliability.
Integrate third-party APIs and services to extend application functionality.
Implement best practices for code quality, performance, security, and maintainability.
Experience with Git or other version control systems.
Troubleshoot and debug issues, perform root cause analysis, and implement solutions in a timely manner.
Participating in daily scrum meetings.
Be able to work as an individual and as part of a team.
Be able to work to tight deadlines.
 
 
Required Experience



 Must Have:

years of experience in .Net
in C#, ASP.NET, MVC, and Web API for backend development.
in Azure Cloud Services like (Azure SQL, Azure App Service, Azure Storage and Azure Function APP)
4 projects should have worked in .Net.
 
 Good to Have: 
years of experience in Angular
Node Js and AWS Cloud


 
Technologies

 
Proficiency in C#, ASP .Net, MVC, MSSQL, HTML, CSS, JQUERY, ADO.NET, Entity Framework, .Net Core 3 or above 

Experience in Azure Services like Azure SQL, Azure App Service, Azure Storage and Azure Function APP
Angular 10 or above


https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3909927500


22.

Description

Are you ready to put your mark on one of Sweden’s most leading tech brand? We are one of the most successful companies in the world that you probably never heard of, according to Forbes Magazine. It is the engineering team’s role to put us into the spotlight.

We are looking for a Full Stack Developer to produce scalable software solutions. You’ll be part of a cross-functional team that’s responsible for the full software development life cycle, from conception to deployment.

If you’re also familiar with Agile methodologies, we’d like to meet you.

The essence of the role

Work with development teams and product managers to ideate software solutions
Build the front-end of applications through appealing visual design
Develop and manage well-functioning backend applications
Write effective APIs
Test software to ensure responsiveness and efficiency
Troubleshoot, debug and upgrade applications
Create security and data protection settings
Write technical documentation
Work with team to improve software

Who are you? 

4+ years of experience as a Full Stack Developer 
Knowledge of multiple front-end languages and libraries (e.g. React, JavaScript)
Expertise Working knowledge of Node.Js 
Expertise is designing REST APIs (GraphQL expertise is added advantage) 
Strong debugging skills
Knowledge of Test Driven Development and Unit Testing Framework
Familiarity with databases (e.g. MySQL, Oracle, MSSQL)
Working knowledge for NoSQL databases is added advantage
Working knowledge of web servers (e.g. Apache, tomcat)
Excellent communication and teamwork skills
Great attention to detail

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3897044666


23.

About Brillio: 

Brillio is one of the fastest growing digital technology service providers and a partner of choice for many Fortune 1000 companies seeking to turn disruption into a competitive advantage through innovative digital adoption. Brillio, renowned for its world-class professionals, referred to as "Brillians", distinguishes itself through their capacity to seamlessly integrate cutting-edge digital and design thinking skills with an unwavering dedication to client satisfaction.

Brillio takes pride in its status as an employer of choice, consistently attracting the most exceptional and talented individuals due to its unwavering emphasis on contemporary, groundbreaking technologies, and exclusive digital projects. Brillio's relentless commitment to providing an exceptional experience to its Brillians and nurturing their full potential consistently garners them the Great Place to Work® certification year after year.

M

Primary Skills

AngularJS, JavaScript, CSS3, React JS, CI/CD Pipeline, Java, Hibernate, Oracle RDBMS, Kafka, Docker, Spring Core, Spring Boot, HTML5, Kubernetes, MySQL 

Job requirements

FullStack Java hands-on development using Springboot ,Microservices , Angular, JavaScript, React, SQL ,HTML,CSS. Conversion replacements 


https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3866971137


24.


Job Purpose or Overview:

As a M.E.R.N. Stack Software Developer, you will be instrumental in leveraging the power of MongoDB, Express.js, React, Nextjs and Nodejs to create robust and scalable software solutions that align with our mission of harnessing technology for the future.


Key Responsibilities/Duties:

Design, develop, and maintain web applications using the M.E.R.N. stack.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define, design, and implement new features.
Ensure code quality, performance, and responsiveness of applications.
Troubleshoot and resolve issues in existing software.
Stay updated with the latest industry trends and tools in software engineering.


Minimum Requirements:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related field.
Solid understanding of the M.E.R.N. stack.
Familiarity with Git and version control systems.
Ability to work in a fast-paced, challenging environment typical of a high-growth startup.
Strong problem-solving skills and passion for software development.


Preferred Requirements:

Master's degree in Computer Science or a related field.
0 - 1 years of professional experience with the M.E.R.N. stack.
Deep knowledge of tools and technologies used in modern software engineering, including CI/CD, cloud services, and containerization.
Portfolio of projects showcasing proficiency in the M.E.R.N. stack and other software engineering tools.


Good to Know:

You will be joining a dynamic team passionate about innovation. The software you develop will play a crucial role in various innovative projects, presenting both challenges and immense learning opportunities.


What We Offer:

Competitive salary and benefits.
Opportunities for professional growth and development.
Access to top-tier learning platforms and resources.
A flexible and collaborative work environment.
Support for R&D endeavors and innovative projects.

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3926640804


25.

Job Description:

 
 Role : Full Stack Lead

 
 Mandatory Skills : React JS & Node JS:

 
 As a Full Stack Lead, you will play a pivotal role in our cross-functional software development team. You’ll work on highly visible strategic projects, serving as an expert-level individual contributor. Your responsibilities will span design, consultation, planning, team leadership, and coding.
 
 Key Responsibilities:

 
 Technical Leadership:

 
 Collaborate with the team to define technical architecture and make informed decisions.
 
 Provide guidance on best practices, code quality, and performance optimization.
 
 Mentor junior developers and foster a culture of continuous learning.
 
 Full Stack Development:

 
 Develop user-facing features using React.js.
 
 Create and maintain back-end services and APIs using Node.js.
 
 Integrate front-end and back-end components to ensure a cohesive user experience.
 
 Manage databases (e.g., MongoDB, MySQL, PostgreSQL).
 
 Required Skills:

 
 
JavaScript: Proficiency in JavaScript concepts and modern ES6+ syntax.
React.js: Strong experience in building user interfaces using React.js.
Node.js: In-depth knowledge of Node.js for server-side development.
RESTful APIs: Ability to design, implement, and consume RESTful APIs.
Database Management: Familiarity with databases (e.g., MongoDB, MySQL, PostgreSQL).
Version Control: Comfortable using Git for version control.
Agile/Scrum: Understanding of Agile methodologies and Scrum practices.

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3925047057


26.


Position: Full-stack developer - Broadcast Engineering 





Purpose: This position will be a programming expert, who will be part of a solution team. 





The candidate will innovate, suggest, and implement suitable codes etc. to achieve business goals or any other requirement affecting technical operations. 





Education: Bachelor of Engineering (B.E), Software/ Information Technology, BSc IT; BCA 





Experience: 0 to 3 Years of experience of working in a media organisation and/or IT developer 



Location: Mumbai 



 Key Responsibilities: Full-stack developer with experience on React JS.

Demonstrated proficiency in back-end scripting/coding.
Hands-on experience with Rest API.
Hands-on experience in developing Angular/React JS applications.
Experience working with any relational database.
Knowledge of coding languages such as C#, Java, and JavaScript is required, and knowledge of Groovy is an added advantage.
Ability to learn new languages and technologies.
Knowledge of setting up AWS resources from scratch is desirable.
Knowledge of MongoDB, Kibana, Grafana, MariaDB, ArangoDB, ElasticSearch, and Redis is preferred.
 


Critical Competencies:

Behavioural
Strong documentation ability.
Effective communication and grasping power to understand Business intent. (Archiving, sending content, time-critical nature of deliveries, video basics, metadata, searching, reporting etc).
Strong problem-solving skills, with the ability to identify and resolve technical issues.
Translate a business logic requirement into a specification and implement the same.
Initiative-taking and not reactive.


https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3920817550


27.



The Role 

As a web developer, you will be responsible to build and handle new microservice solutions. You will architect, develop and lead new web applications to support the marketers need along with implementing Adobe Target and Analytics on the websites. You will be encouraged to participate in all aspects of the web application development lifecycle including the architecture, design, development, and maintenance. You will be expected to:

Work with Marketing Technology Engineering team and other product teams to conceptualise and design the overall architecture of web application. 
Develop an application to manage and detail the Experience cloud implementation and Enablement process
Write effective and responsive APIs to integrate Martech solutions to onboard offline datasets and extend the capability in Adobe's Experience Platform. 
Collaborate with the rest of the Martech team to build and launch new features including the support for building CI/CD pipeline. 

Desired skills & Experiences required

Proven experience as a Full Stack developer or similar role. 
Familiarity with common stacks (Preferably MERN or MEAN)
Good understanding of front-end languages and libraries (e.g. HTML/ CSS, JavaScript, XML, jQuery) and JavaScript frameworks (e.g. React)
Knowledge of multiple back-end languages (e.g. Node.js, Java, Python). Familiarity with databases (e.g. MySQL, MongoDB), Docker, Kubernetes, web servers (e.g. Apache) and UI/UX design. 
Knowledge of code versioning tools such as Git
Good understanding on Web Analytics and reporting tools like Adobe Analytics or Google Analytics. 
Knowledge on web optimization and personalization. 
Write API documentation. 
B.Tech / M.Tech degree in Computer Science from a premier institute. 
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and solid attention to detail. 


https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3925222768


28.


Job Description

Fractal is a leading AI & analytics organization. We have a strong Fullstack Team with great leaders accelerating the growth.Our people enjoy a collaborative work environment, exceptional training, and career development as well as unlimited growth opportunities. We have a Glassdoor rating of 4/5 and achieve customer NPS of 9/10. If you like working with a curious, supportive, high-performing team, Fractal is the place for you.

Responsibilities

As a Senior Fullstack (React and Python) Engineer, you would be part of the team consisting of Scrum Master, Cloud Engineers, AI/ML Engineers, and UI/UX Engineers to build end-to-end Data to Decision Systems. You would report to a Lead Architect.

 Architecting, estimating, managing, developing & maintaining the backend and frontend for various Data to Decision projects for our Fortune 500 client
 Work closely with the data science & engineering team to integrate the algorithmic output from the backend REST APIs
 Work closely with business and product owners to create dynamic infographics with intuitive user controls
 Help the junior engineers on the project to effectively code and deliver as per the sprint plan and take care of their career aspirations and goals
 Be the speaker in translating technical project journey and sharing with clients
 Participate in UAT, and diagnose & troubleshoot, bugs and application integration issues
 Create and maintain documentation related to the developed processes and applications
 Ideally, this would include the following: o Expert-level proficiency with JavaScript (ES6), HTML5 & CSS o Expert-level proficiency with ReactJS or VueJS o Expert-level proficiency with Java SE, SpringBoot or Play Framework
 Familiarity with common databases (RDBMS such as MySQL & NoSQL such as MongoDB) and data warehousing concepts (OLAP, OLTP)
 Understanding of REST concepts and building/interacting with REST APIs
 Deep understanding of a few UI concepts: o Cross-browser compatibility and implementing responsive web design o Hands-on experience with test driven development, using testing libraries like Jest and jUnit o Familiarity with common JS visualization libraries built


QUALIFICATIONS: REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS: 

 3-8 years of demonstrable experience designing, building, and working as a Fullstack Engineer for enterprise web applications


https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3873350074


29.


Job Summary

The primary purpose of this role is to translate business requirements and functional specifications into logical program designs and to deliver code modules, stable application systems, and software solutions. This includes developing, configuring, or modifying complex integrated business and/or enterprise application solutions within various computing environments. This role facilitates the implementation and maintenance of complex business and enterprise software solutions to ensure successful deployment of released applications.

Roles & Responsibilities

Execute full software development life cycle (SDLC)
Develop flowcharts and documentation to identify requirements and solutions.
Write well-designed, testable code.
Produce specifications and determine operational feasibility.
Integrate software components into a fully functional software system.
Develop software verification plans and quality assurance procedures.
Document and maintain software functionality.
Troubleshoot, debug, and upgrade existing systems.
Deploy programs and evaluate user feedback.
Comply with project plans and industry standards.
Ensure software is updated with latest features.

Years Of Experience

2 to 8 years of experience in developing web applications. (Excluding the internship experience)

Education Qualification 

List the education, certification, and work experience for an incumbent in the job. Enter the Minimum Qualifications and Preferred Qualifications as directed, and delete the areas not used.

List the education, certification, work experience and skills required to minimally qualify an individual for the job.

Bachelor’s degree in computer science, CIS, or related field (or equivalent work experience in a related field).

Primary Skills

Proven work experience as a Software Engineer or Software Developer
Experience designing interactive applications.
Ability to develop software in Python, React and Node JS programming languages.
Good knowledge of relational databases.
Experience with test-driven development
Proficiency in software engineering tools
Ability to document requirements and specifications.
Good to have Airflow platform knowledge (optional)
Experience with CI/CD pipelines
Familiarity with Agile/Scrum methodologies

Secondary Skills

Good to have google cloud platform knowledge/experience.


https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3927345273


30.

Job Overview:

We are seeking a Full Stack Engineer to join our growing team. As a Full Stack Engineer, you will play a key role in developing and maintaining both front-end and back-end components of our web applications. The ideal candidate should have expertise in Python coupled with experience in Node.js, Vue.js, or React. 



Qualifications:

Adeptmind engineers have a special forces mindset to solve problems quickly, sometimes resorting to unconventional methods.
We’re looking for a self-starter, go-getter, smart, and open-minded engineer with great interpersonal skills. Technical requirements are mentioned below:


Strong proficiency and excellent coding skills in Python. 
Experience with front-end technologies such as Vue.js or React.
Expertise in distributed systems, SEO optimization, and server-side rendered front-end applications (e.g., NextJS, Gatsby, Nuxt).
Familiarity with RESTful APIs and microservices architecture.
Experience with cloud services (AWS, Google Cloud)
Solid understanding of database systems (e.g., MySQL, MongoDB).
Excellent communication and collaboration skills.
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science preferred.


Responsibilities:



Collaborate with cross-functional teams to design, develop, and implement new features and enhancements for our web applications.
Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code for both front-end and back-end development.
Manage continuous delivery of Adeptmind’s products
Implement the most advanced page optimization techniques for top UX and crawler friendliness
Build a scalable orchestrator to manage millions of pages 
Build an interface for internal and client-facing management
Ability to navigate large-scale systems for both debugging and development


Company Culture:

At Adeptmind, we cultivate a community of highly intelligent and hardworking individuals who share a common mission. Our collaborative approach, supporting one another and promoting professional growth, is the essence of our culture. We value learning, development, and internal promotions.

https://www.linkedin.com/jobs/view/3929027397


